Hawaii statutes.
[§173A-12] Federal and other grants.
The board and any county may comply with any condition, regulation,
restriction, or requirement imposed by the United States or any other
governmental agency, or by any person in any program providing grants or other
funds for the acquisition of land having value as a resource to the State. [L
1973, c 77, §12]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next